Massachusetts, session 194th, H1598.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 35A of chapter 218 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following paragraph:
Any hearing held pursuant to this section, and any record associated with such hearing
shall be presumed to be open to the public unless the court, or said officer thereof, makes a
written finding, for good cause shown, that the defendant’s interest in privacy outweighs the
public’s right of access. Any such finding shall be made only after a hearing on the record, in
which the court may permit an interested non-party, who files a notice of appearance limited to
participation in the proceeding, to be heard. Any such finding shall state with specificity the
reason for closing the hearing and shall be narrowly tailored to said reason. All hearings held
pursuant to this section shall be taken stenographically or recorded and transcribed.
of 1